Utah statutes.
41-1a-119.   Emergency procedures for collection of fees.
(1)  If the commission finds that the owner or operator of a vehicle who is
liable for the payment of any registration fee required by this chapter plans
to depart quickly from the state, to remove the owner or operator’s property
from the state, to conceal the owner or operator’s person or property, or do
any other act tending to prejudice or render wholly or partially ineffectual
proceedings to collect the registration fees, the commission shall follow the
emergency procedures set forth in Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, and declare that the registration fees are immediately due and
payable.
(2)  When the commission issues its emergency order, the registration fees are
immediately due and payable after notice is given to the owner or operator of
the vehicle.
